Massachusetts, session 194th, H2717.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of Chapter 6E (a) of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after the
words “Massachusetts Bar Association” the words: “1 of whom shall be appointed from a list of
3 nominations submitted by the Massachusetts Coalition of Police.”
of 1